pt-BR: Tipo de montagem da pinça de freio: Montagem axial; Montagem radial; Outro
sk-SK: Typ uchytenia brzdového strmeňa: Axiálne uchytenie; Radiálne uchytenie; Iné
cs: Typ uchycení brzdového třmenu: Axiální upevnění; Radiální upevnění; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve zavorne čeljusti: Aksialni nosilec; Radialni nosilec; Drugo
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งคาลิเปอร์เบรก: แบบแกนร่วม; แบบเรเดียล; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de montaje de la pinza de freno: Montaje axial; Montaje radial; Otro
tr: Fren kaliperi montaj tipi: Eksenel bağlantı; Radyal bağlantı; Diğer
sv: Fästtyp för bromsoket: Axialt fäste; Radialt fäste; Övrigt
de: Befestigungstyp des Bremssattels: Axiale Montage; Radiale Montage; Sonstige
ja: ブレーキキャリパーマウントタイプ: アキシャルマウント; ラジアルマウント; その他
fi: Jarrusatulan kiinnitystyyppi: Aksiaalikiinnitys; Radiaalikiinnitys; Muu
fr: Type de montage de l’étrier de frein: Montage axial; Montage radial; Autre
nl: Remklauw bevestiging type: Axiale montage; Radiale montage; Overig
bg-BG: Тип на монтаж на спирачния апарат: Аксиален монтаж; Радиален монтаж; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da pinça de travão: Montagem axial; Montagem radial; Outro
ko: 브레이크 캘리퍼 장착 방식: 액시얼 마운트; 래디얼 마운트; 기타
it: tipo di montaggio pinza freno: Attacco assiale; Attacco radiale; Altro
vi: Loại giá đỡ kẹp phanh: Gắn trục; Gắn hướng kính; Khác
zh-CN: 制动卡钳安装类型: 轴向安装; 径向安装; 其他
hu: Féknyereg rögzítési típusa: Axiális rögzítés; Radiális rögzítés; Egyéb
ru: Тип крепления тормозного суппорта: Аксиальное крепление; Радиальное крепление; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta nosača kočione čeljusti: Aksijalni nosač; Radijalni nosač; Ostalo
el: Τύπος βάσης δαγκάνας φρένων: Αξονική βάση; Ακτινωτή βάση; Άλλο
nb: Bremsekaliperfestetype: Aksialt feste; Radialt feste; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul de montare a etrierului de frână: Montare axială; Montare radială; Altele
zh-TW: 煞車卡鉗安裝類型: 軸向安裝; 徑向安裝; 其他
lt-LT: Stabdžių suporto montavimo tipas: Ašinis tvirtinimas; Radialinis tvirtinimas; Kitas
en: Brake caliper mount type: Axial mount; Radial mount; Other
pl: Typ mocowania zacisku hamulcowego: Mocowanie osiowe; Mocowanie promieniowe; Inne
da: Type af montering til bremsekaliber: Aksial montering; Radial montering; Andet